Nevada, session 83, AB294.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 603 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A person that operates an online platform, Internet website
or other Internet-based service that, as its primary business,
publishes or makes available material that is harmful to minors:
(a) Shall establish an age verification system to determine
whether a prospective user of the platform, website or service is a
minor before allowing the prospective user to access any material
that is harmful to minors published or made available on the
platform, website or service; and
(b) Shall not authorize a prospective user of the platform,
website or service to access any material that is harmful to minors
published or made available on the platform, website or service if
the person knows or reasonably believes the prospective user to be
a minor based on a determination made by the age verification
system established pursuant to paragraph (a).
2. A person shall be deemed to be in compliance with the
requirements of paragraph (a) of subsection 1 if the person
establishes an age verification system that verifies that a user is 18
years of age or older by:
(a) Requiring the user to upload a copy of a government-
issued identification card or submit an electronic version of a
government-issued identification card;
(b) Using any commercially reasonable method that relies on
public or private transactional data to verify the age of the user; or
(c) Using a third-party age verification service to verify the age
of the user.
3. A person that operates an online platform, Internet website
or other Internet-based service that publishes or makes available
material that is harmful to minors as its primary business:
(a) Is subject to the obligations and liabilities of chapter 603A
of NRS with regard to the security and privacy of any personal
information collected under this section; and
(b) Shall not use or retain any personal information collected
under this section for any purpose except to:
(1) Verify the age of a prospective user; or
(2) Prove that the person has complied with the
requirements of this section.
4. A person who willfully violates this section is subject to a
civil penalty of not more than $10,000 for each violation. The
Attorney General may recover the penalty in a civil action brought
in the name of the State of Nevada in any court of competent
-
*AB294*

– 3 –
jurisdiction. Any civil penalty collected pursuant to this section
must be used for the purpose of enforcing the provisions of this
section.
5. The parent or guardian of a minor may bring a civil action
for damages against a person who violates this section. Upon
prevailing in a civil action brought pursuant to this section, the
parent or guardian may recover compensatory damages,
reasonable attorney’s fees and any punitive damages that the facts
may warrant.
6. The provisions of this section do not apply to an Internet
service provider, search engine or cloud service provider that
provides access or connection to or from an online platform,
Internet website or other Internet-based service that, as its primary
business, publishes or makes available material that is harmful to
minors.
7. As used in this section:
(a) “Government-issued identification card” includes, without
limitation, a passport, driver’s license, permanent resident card or
tribal identification card.
(b) “Harmful to minors” has the meaning ascribed to it in
NRS 201.257.
Sec. 2. NRS 603.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
603.010 As used in NRS 603.010 to 603.090, inclusive, and
section 1 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires, the
words and terms defined in NRS 603.020 and 603.030 have the
meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective on January 1, 2026.
H
-
*AB294*